Massachusetts, session 194th, H1252.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  Section 1 of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition for 'Foreign company'', the 
following definition:- 
“Gender identity” shall mean a person's gender-related identity, appearance or behavior, 
whether or not that gender-related identity, appearance or behavior is different from that 
traditionally associated with the person's physiology or assigned sex at birth. Gender-related 
identity may be shown by providing evidence including, but not limited to, medical history, care 
or treatment of the gender-related identity, consistent and uniform assertion of the gender-related 
identity or any other evidence that the gender-related identity is sincerely held as part of a 
person's core identity; provided, however, that gender-related identity shall not be asserted for 
any improper purpose. 

of 2 12  SECTION 2. Section 4C of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the word “sex”, in line ___, the following words:- , gender identity. 
SECTION 3. Section 24A of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the word “sex ”, in line __, the following words:-  or gender identity. 
SECTION 4. Section 120F of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the word “sex”, in line ___, the following words:- , gender identity. 
SECTION 5. Section 122 of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the word “sex”, in line ___, the following words:- , gender identity, 
and after the word “sex” in line ___, the following words:- , or gender identity. 
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.